Montana, session 2025, LC1852.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1852.1

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Prohibition on use of local government funds for lobbying. (1) A
local government may not:
(a) pay dues, membership fees, agency fees, or any similar payments to an entity or person that
engages in legislative or administrative lobbying on proposed legislation or proposed administrative rules
regardless of whether the person is registered as a lobbyist under Title 5, section 7; or
(b) provide compensation to any individual for engaging in legislative or administrative lobbying in
any capacity.
(2) A local government official or other public employee who causes a local government to violate
subsection (1) is personally liable for the prohibited payment.
(3) Subsection (1) may not be construed to:
(a) prevent payment to public employees and contractors for other services rendered; or
(b) infringe the right of a person, including a public employee, to lobby or otherwise attempt to
influence public policy while not using public time, funds, or other resources.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "local government" has the same meaning as provided in 2-6-
1002.

Section 2. Section 17-8-108, MCA, is amended to read:
"17-8-108. Prohibited uses of public funds. (1) Public funds or money may not be expended for an
abortion. The limitations contained in this section do not apply to an abortion:
(1)(a) if the pregnancy is the result of an act of rape or incest; or
(2)(b) in the case in which a woman suffers from a physical disorder, physical injury, or physical
illness, including a life-endangering physical condition caused by or arising from the pregnancy itself, that
would, as certified by a physician, place the woman in danger of death unless an abortion is performed.
(2) An agency of state government may not:
(a) pay dues, membership fees, agency fees, or any similar payments to an entity or person that
engages in legislative or administrative lobbying on proposed legislation or proposed administrative rules
regardless of whether the person is registered as a lobbyist under Title 5, section 7; or
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1852.1
(b) provide compensation to an individual for engaging in legislative or administrative lobbying in
any capacity.
(3) A state official or other public employee who causes an agency of state government to violate
subsection (2) is personally liable for the prohibited payment.
(4) Subsection (2) may not be construed to:
(a) prevent payment to public employees and contractors for other services rendered; or
(b) infringe the right of a person, including a public employee, to lobby or otherwise attempt to
influence public policy while not using public time, funds, or other resources."

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Repealer. The following section of the Montana Code Annotated is
repealed:
5-7-106. Disclosure of local government lobbying contract -- exemption for local government
associations.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 5, chapter 7, part 1, and the provisions of Title 5, chapter 7, part 1, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – ****